Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska19-3301
Act, how cited.

Sections 19-3301 to 19-3326 shall be known and may be cited as the Offstreet Parking District Act.

Laws 1967, c. 60, § 1, p. 198;

R.S.Supp.,1967, § 16-812;

Laws 1969, c. 88, § 1, p. 437;

Laws 1997, LB 746, § 2.